District of Columbia statutes.
4-1321.04

Immunity from liability.

Any person, hospital, or institution participating in good faith in the making of a report pursuant to this subchapter shall have immunity from liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed with respect to the making of the report. Any such participation shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding involving the report. In all civil or criminal proceedings concerning the child or resulting from the report good faith shall be presumed unless rebutted.

Nov. 6, 1966, 80 Stat. 1354, Pub. L. 89-775, § 4
Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title I, § 103(e), 24 DCR 3341
1981 Ed., § 2-1354.
1973 Ed., § 2-164.